Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1026.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1302-D of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 1302-D. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Hate-based intimidation." A criminal act of inflicting 12345678910111213141516171819202122 physical injury on another individual, harm to property or other type of injury, which is motivated by hatred toward the actual or perceived race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation or disability of another individual or group of individuals with which the other individual is associated.* * *Section 2. Section 1303-D(c)(1) and (2) and (d) of the act are amended and subsection (c) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1303-D. Safe2Say Program.* * *(c) Program requirements.--Beginning January 14, 2019, the program shall be responsible for the following:(1) To ensure anonymous reporting concerning unsafe, potentially harmful, dangerous, violent [or] and criminal activities, including the reporting of hate-based intimidation, in a school entity or the threat of the activities in a school entity.(2) To establish protocols and procedures to promptly notify the appropriate law enforcement agency via 911 centers and the Pennsylvania State Police when the program receives an anonymous report of violent [or] and criminal activities, including an anonymous report of hate-based intimidation, in a school entity that poses an immediate threat of violence or criminal activity and creates a substantial risk of serious bodily injury.* * *(11) To train and provide instruction to employees of school entities on how to recognize and report hate-based 20250SB1026PN1190 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 intimidation by incorporating such training and instruction into current training . (d) School entity.--Each school entity shall:(1) develop procedures for assessing and responding to reports received from the program[.]; and(2) require each school in the school entity to incorporate into periodic in-service training sessions appropriate instruction in recognizing and reporting conduct, including hate-based intimidation, that poses an immediate threat of violence and creates a substantial risk of serious bodily injury to any person.Section 3. Article XX-J heading of the act is amended to read:ARTICLE XX-JPOSTSECONDARY INSTITUTION SEXUAL HARASSMENT [AND], SEXUALVIOLENCE AND HATE-BASED INTIMIDATION POLICY ANDONLINE REPORTING SYSTEMSection 4. Section 2001-J of the act is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 2001-J. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Hate-based intimidation." A criminal act of inflicting physical injury on another individual, harm to property or other type of injury, which is motivated by hatred toward the actual or perceived race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation or disability of another individual or group of individuals with which the other individual is associated.20250SB1026PN1190 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 5. Sections 2002-J and 2003-J of the act are amended to read:Section 2002-J. Policy for postsecondary institution sexual harassment [and], sexual violence and hate-based intimidation.(a) Adoption.--A postsecondary institution shall adopt a clear, understandable written policy on sexual harassment [and], sexual violence and hate-based intimidation that informs victims and students of their rights under Federal and State law, including the crime victims bill of rights. No later than December 31, 2025, a postsecondary institution shall amend its current policy on sexual harassment and sexual violence to include provisions to govern hate-based intimidation.(b) Report.--(1) The sexual harassment [and], sexual violence and hate-based intimidation policy under subsection (a) shall include a provision that a witness or victim of an incident of sexual harassment [or], sexual violence or hate-based intimidation who reports the incident in good faith will not be sanctioned by the institution for admitting in the report to a violation of the institution's student conduct policy on the personal use of drugs or alcohol.(2) Nothing in this article may be construed to prohibit a postsecondary institution from including a provision in its sexual harassment, sexual violence and hate-based intimidation policy to govern the receipt of reports from the general public, provided that the public reports involve a student of the postsecondary institution.(c) Model policy.--The Department of Education shall develop 20250SB1026PN1190 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a model policy and make the model policy available to postsecondary institutions. A postsecondary institution may adopt the model policy as the policy of the institution on sexual harassment [and], sexual violence and hate-based intimidation.(d) Construction.--Nothing in this section may be construed to infringe or limit an individual's rights or freedoms that are otherwise protected by the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of Pennsylvania.Section 2003-J. Online reporting system.(a) Establishment of online reporting system.--A postsecondary institution shall establish and maintain an online reporting system to receive complaints of sexual harassment [and], sexual violence and hate-based intimidation from students and employees. A report shall be investigated through the process established in the postsecondary institution's sexual harassment [and], sexual violence and hate-based intimidation policy. A postsecondary institution may not fail or refuse to investigate an anonymous report because it is anonymous.(b) Anonymous reports.--The online reporting system shall permit anonymous reports, which shall be investigated in accordance with subsection (a).(c) Required information.--A postsecondary institution shall provide students and employees making reports under this section with the following:(1) Information regarding who will receive and have access to the reports filed.(2) How information gathered through the online reporting system will be used.(3) Contact information for on-campus and off-campus 20250SB1026PN1190 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 organizations serving victims of sexual harassment [and], sexual violence and hate-based intimidation.(d) Statement.--The online reporting system shall prominently post the online system's policy regarding reports and investigations of sexual harassment [and], sexual violence and hate-based intimidation and shall encourage individuals to review the policy for more information about procedures and resources.(e) Access to data.--A postsecondary institution shall limit access to the data collected, created or maintained under subsection (a) to only the data subject and as follows:(1) Only individuals with explicit authorization from a postsecondary institution may enter, update, access, share or disseminate electronic data related to an incident of sexual harassment [or], sexual violence and hate-based intimidation collected, created or maintained under this section.(2) The ability of an authorized individual to enter, update, access, share or disseminate data must be limited through the use of role-based access that corresponds to the official duties or training level of the individual and the institutional authorization that grants access for that purpose.(3) Actions in which the data related to an incident of sexual harassment [or], sexual violence or hate-based intimidation are entered, updated, accessed, shared or disseminated outside the postsecondary institution must be recorded in a data audit trail.(4) An institution shall immediately and permanently revoke the authorization of an individual determined to have willfully entered, updated, accessed, shared or disseminated 20250SB1026PN1190 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 data in violation of this section.(5) An institution or individual implementing, operating or working for the program may not be compelled to produce a record except pursuant to a court order.Section 6. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB1026PN1190 - 7 - 12345